src/fst/test/gt-dict-yamls/dict-gt-yamls/N-Clex_kaahus_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - kááhuš: # MLO, ok
    kááhuš+N+Sg+Nom: kááhuš
    kááhuš+N+Sg+Gen: kahhuu
    kááhuš+N+Sg+Acc: kahhuu
    kááhuš+N+Sg+Ill: kahhuužân
    kááhuš+N+Sg+Loc: kahhuust
    kááhuš+N+Sg+Com: kahhuin
    kááhuš+N+Sg+Abe: kahhuuttáá
    kááhuš+N+Ess: kahhuužin
    kááhuš+N+Par: kahhuužid
    kááhuš+N+Pl+Nom: kahhuuh
    kááhuš+N+Pl+Gen: kahhui
    kááhuš+N+Pl+Acc: kahhuid
    kááhuš+N+Pl+Ill: kahhuid
    kááhuš+N+Pl+Loc: kahhuin
    kááhuš+N+Pl+Com: kahhuiguin
    kááhuš+N+Pl+Abe: kahhuittáá

  Noun - kiärtuš: # MLO: this is a neologism, so it is difficult to say whether this is the correct inflection but it is at least according to the normal sound change model; I have only seen sg Nom in use
    kiärtuš+N+Sg+Nom: kiärtuš
    kiärtuš+N+Sg+Gen: kerttuu
    kiärtuš+N+Sg+Acc: kerttuu
    kiärtuš+N+Sg+Ill: kerttuužân
    kiärtuš+N+Sg+Loc: kerttuust
    kiärtuš+N+Sg+Com: kerttuin
    kiärtuš+N+Sg+Abe: kerttuuttáá
    kiärtuš+N+Ess: kerttuužin
    kiärtuš+N+Par: kerttuužid
    kiärtuš+N+Pl+Nom: kerttuuh
    kiärtuš+N+Pl+Gen: kerttui
    kiärtuš+N+Pl+Acc: kerttuid
    kiärtuš+N+Pl+Ill: kerttuid
    kiärtuš+N+Pl+Loc: kerttuin
    kiärtuš+N+Pl+Com: kerttuiguin
    kiärtuš+N+Pl+Abe: kerttuittáá
